Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6410
Stacking of coverage; prohibited; exception.

Regardless of the number of vehicles involved, persons covered, claims made, vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or premiums paid, the limits of liability for uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage for two or more motor vehicles insured under the same policy or separate policies shall not be added together, combined, or stacked to determine the limit of insurance coverage available to an injured person for any one accident except as provided in section 44-6411.

Laws 1986, LB 573, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-579;

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 10.

Policies shall not be stacked. American States Ins. Co. v. Farm Bureau Ins. Co., 7 Neb. App. 507, 583 N.W.2d 358 (1998).